Utah statutes.
78B-15-510.   Identical brothers.

(1)  The tribunal may order genetic testing of a brother of a man identified as the father of a child if the man is commonly believed to have an identical brother and evidence suggests that the brother may be the genetic father of the child.

(2)  If each brother satisfies the requirements as the identified father of the child under Section 78B-15-505 without consideration of another identical brother being identified as the father of the child, the tribunal may rely on nongenetic evidence to adjudicate which brother is the father of the child.

